Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Administration

Proper and exclusive method of challenging right of financial institutions board member to hold office

is a quo warranto proceeding. First Nat'l Bank v. Financial Insts. Bd., 616 P.2d 787,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

Actions of board improperly constituted deemed valid and binding.—

Actions taken by the financial institutions board, even if improperly constituted, are actions of a de facto board and, therefore, valid and binding. First Nat'l Bank v. Financial Insts. Bd., 616 P.2d 787,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1980) (decided under prior law).

§ 13-1-601.
State banking commissioner; designation; appointment; removal.

The supervisor of the division of banking within the department of audit shall be designated the state banking commissioner. The commissioner shall be appointed by the director of the state department of audit, and shall serve at the pleasure of the director. The commissioner may be removed from office by the director in the same manner as the governor may remove a gubernatorial appointee as provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall advise and consult with the state banking board before appointing or removing the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 13-1-602.
State banking commissioner; qualifications; compensation.

The commissioner shall have not less than seven (7) years experience in the commercial banking industry, or seven (7) years experience as an examiner or administrative officer with the federal deposit insurance corporation, federal reserve system, office of the comptroller of the currency or a state banking regulatory department, or a combination thereof, with continually increasing administrative authority and responsibility throughout the period of experience.

The salary of the commissioner shall be fixed by the director, after consultation with the state banking board, and within limits prescribed by the appropriation from the legislature.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 1.

§ 13-1-603.
State banking commissioner; powers and duties.

The commissioner shall administer the laws and regulations governing the organization, operation, examination, reorganization or dissolution of banks in Wyoming. The commissioner is directly responsible to and subject to the direction of the director. The commissioner may employ one (1) or more deputy commissioners, who, in the absence or disability of the commissioner, shall exercise all powers of the commissioner.

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 42, § 3.

Without limiting the other powers, duties and responsibilities conferred upon the commissioner by law, the commissioner may:

Conduct an investigation if the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe that a financial institution, a bank holding company or person has violated, is violating or is about to violate a state statute or rule relating to financial institutions or bank holding companies, or has engaged, is engaging or is about to engage in an unsafe and unsound practice;

Administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and testimony, adduce evidence and require by subpoena the production of any books, papers, records, files, correspondence, documents and other evidence the commissioner deems relevant to any examination or investigation authorized by this act;

Request the attorney general to bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce and administer the provisions of this act, to seek an award of any civil penalty authorized by law and any other appropriate relief at law and equity including an order requiring compliance with any subpoena or order issued by the commissioner pursuant to this act;

Consult with the board regarding the administration and operation of the dual banking system and the banking business in Wyoming;

Adopt rules to implement and administer the laws governing financial institutions and bank holding companies in this state;

Recommend to the legislature the amendment or enactment of laws to foster competition between banks and federally chartered financial institutions within this state and to promote the dual banking system within the state; and

Perform any acts and make any decisions incidental to or necessary for carrying out any powers, duties or responsibilities expressly conferred upon the commissioner by law.

The commissioner shall establish any fee by rule and regulation if any provision of this title authorizes the fee to be established by rule and regulation of the commissioner. The fee shall be established in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and shall be set in an amount to ensure that, to the extent practicable, the total amount generated from the fee approximates but does not exceed the direct and indirect costs incurred by the commissioner in carrying out his duties as a result of the submission or supervisory activity for which a fee is authorized.

Not later than October 1 of each year, the commissioner shall submit a report to the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee listing all fees collected in the immediately preceding fiscal year by the commissioner including those authorized or required pursuant to this title and any other provision of law. The report shall separately identify the amount collected for each fee collected.

The commissioner may, after review and consideration of actual and projected revenues and expenditures in the current fiscal year, decrease the aggregate amount of an installment and bill a proportionately lower amount to each financial institution subject to an assessment.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 1994, ch. 14, § 1; 1999, ch. 42, §§ 2, 3; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 40, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017,
in (a), substituted “one (1) or more deputy commissioners”
for “a deputy commissioner”; and added (d).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, in (d), substituted "any provision of this title" for "this act" in the first sentence, added "but does not exceed" in the second sentence; and added (e) and (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

Qualified immunity for bank regulators. —

The defendants acted within the scope of their employment as state regulators and in accordance with this section; there is no evidence that they violated any law, much less any evidence that they knew or should have known that their warnings to the board of directors of a bank triggered the plaintiff-bank president's right to due process. Hence, qualified immunity should have protected the defendants from liability. Lenz v. Dewey, 64 F.3d 547, 1995 U.S. App. LEXIS 24140 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1995).

§ 13-1-604.
State banking board created; purpose; membership; appointment; qualifications; term of office.

There is created within the division of banking in the department of audit a state banking board. The board shall consult with and provide advice and counsel to the commissioner and the director as requested regarding the administration and operation of the dual banking system and the banking business in Wyoming.

The state banking board shall consist of eight (8) members who shall be appointed by the governor. The director shall serve as an ex officio member of the board. Of the appointed members, five (5) shall be officers or directors of state or national banks domiciled in Wyoming, one (1) member shall be an officer or director of a public trust company as defined by W.S. 13-5-301(a)(xiv), and two (2) members shall be residents of Wyoming who are not officers, directors or employees of any bank or public trust company. No member of the banking board shall have any interest, directly or indirectly, in a bank or public trust company in which any other member of the banking board has any interest. Any member of the board who ceases to have the qualifications for which the member was appointed shall be disqualified to serve and a vacancy shall occur.

Of the initial appointments to the banking board, one (1) member representing a state bank and one (1) member representing a national bank shall be appointed for a one (1) year term, one (1) member representing a state bank and one (1) member who is not an officer or director of any bank shall be appointed for a two (2) year term, and the remaining members shall be appointed for a three (3) year term. After the initial appointments, all appointments shall be for a three (3) year term. All appointments shall commence on July 1 of the year of appointment. Vacancies occurring because of disqualification, death, resignation, or for any reason, shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired portion of the term.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2021 ch. 3, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (b), substituted "eight (8)" for "seven (7)" in the first sentence, rewrote the third sentence, which read, "Of the appointed members, five (5) shall be officers or directors of state or national banks domiciled in Wyoming, one (1) member shall be an officer or director of a public trust company as defined by W.S. 13-5-301(a)(xiv), and two (2) members shall be residents of Wyoming who are not officers, directors or employees of any bank or public trust company," and added "or public trust company" following "in a bank."

Financial institutions board. —

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 4, provides: “It is the intent of the legislature that all duties previously performed by the financial institutions board, which is abolished by this act, shall be performed by the state banking board after the effective date of this act.”

§ 13-1-605.
State banking board; meetings; compensation; purpose.

The board shall meet when called by the commissioner or when requested by a majority of the members of the board. Members of the board shall receive the same salary, mileage and per diem for attending and traveling to and from board meetings in the same manner and amount as members of the Wyoming legislature.

The banking board shall:

Consult with and assist the director in the appointment or the removal of the state banking commissioner;

Consult with and advise the commissioner on strengths and weaknesses in the banking industry in Wyoming, and in the general economy of the state as reflected by the banking business;

Recommend to the commissioner such changes in laws or regulations governing the banking industry as may be necessary to meet changes in the financial services industry;

Assist the commissioner and the director in providing information to the legislature to support statutory reform necessary to maintain a strong, healthy banking industry;

Perform such other functions as requested by the commissioner to promote and maintain the dual banking system;

Perform the duties prescribed in W.S.

13-2-207

through

13-2-215

;

Perform the duties prescribed in W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 175, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, added (b)(vii).

Cross references. —

As to compensation of members of legislature, see art. 3, § 6, Wyo. Const.

§ 13-1-606.
State banking board; procedures and practices.

In addition to other powers conferred by law, the board may regulate its own procedures and practices as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 177, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

13-2-206

; Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 115, § 2, renumbered this section, which formerly was §

13-2-206

.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).